Arkansas, session 2025, HB1755.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 13, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-13-114. Arkansas Prevention Needs Assessment Survey — Required
participation.
(a) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year and each year thereafter,
each public school in the State of Arkansas shall administer the Arkansas
Prevention Needs Assessment Survey so that public schools, public school
districts, and communities can effectively improve the lives of students
concerning issues, with a focus on alcohol, tobacco, drug use, mental health,
academic failure, and violence.
(b) The Office of Substance Abuse and Mental Health of the Department
of Human Services shall:
(1) Maintain the survey; and
(2) Provide technical assistance to public schools for the
administration of the survey and required reporting, planning, and
development of school mental health prevention and intervention strategies
*TNL096*
03/11/2025 3:08:06 PM TNL096

HB1755
informed by the survey results.
(c)(1) A public school district superintendent or his or her designee
shall provide written notification to parents and legal guardians of enrolled
students before the administration of the survey under this section.
(2) The written notification required under subdivision (d)(1)
of this section shall include information to parents and legal guardians of
enrolled students that they may opt their child out of the survey by
providing written notice to the public school district.
(d) Before the annual administration of the survey under this section,
the Office of Substance Abuse and Mental Health of the Department of Human
Services shall provide the previous year's survey results to the:
(1) President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(2) Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(3) Chair of the House Committee on Education and Chair of the
Senate Committee on Education; and
(4) Chair of the House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and
Labor and Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.
(e)(1) This section shall be subject to the availability of federal
funding.
(2) If federal funding is insufficient to provide the survey to
public school students on an annual basis as required by this section, then
the administration of the survey is not required.
(f) As used in this section, the "Arkansas Prevention Needs Assessment
Survey" means the annual substance abuse prevention and mental health survey
of public school students in grades six (6), eight (8), ten (10), and twelve
(12) that is managed by the Office of Substance Abuse and Mental Health of
the Department of Human Services.
(g) The Office of Substance Abuse and Mental Health of the Department
of Human Services and the State Board of Education may promulgate rules to
carry out this section.






03/11/2025 3:08:06 PM TNL096